src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_aarran_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - aarrân: # ok 1B v-g, VVCC > VC, C > C1
    aarrân+N+Sg+Nom: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Gen: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Acc: aarrân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Ill: arânân
    aarrân+N+Sg+Loc: arânist
    aarrân+N+Sg+Com: arânáin
    aarrân+N+Sg+Abe: aarrânttáá
    aarrân+N+Ess: arânin
    aarrân+N+Par: arânid
    aarrân+N+Pl+Nom: arâneh
    aarrân+N+Pl+Gen: arânij
    aarrân+N+Pl+Acc: arânijd
    aarrân+N+Pl+Ill: arânáid
    aarrân+N+Pl+Loc: arânijn
    aarrân+N+Pl+Com: [arânijguin, arânijgijn]
    aarrân+N+Pl+Abe: arânijttáá

  Noun - čäällim: # ok 1B v-g, ääll-›äl
    čäällim+N+Sg+Nom: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Gen: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Acc: čäällim
    čäällim+N+Sg+Ill: čälimân
    čäällim+N+Sg+Loc: čälimist
    čäällim+N+Sg+Com: čälimáin
    čäällim+N+Sg+Abe: čäällimttáá
    čäällim+N+Ess: čälimin
    čäällim+N+Par: čälimid
    čäällim+N+Pl+Nom: čälimeh
    čäällim+N+Pl+Gen: čälimij
    čäällim+N+Pl+Acc: čälimijd
    čäällim+N+Pl+Ill: čälimáid
    čäällim+N+Pl+Loc: čälimijn
    čäällim+N+Pl+Com: [čälimijguin, čälimijgijn]
    čäällim+N+Pl+Abe: čälimijttáá
    
  Noun - viettâr: # ok 1B
    viettâr+N+Sg+Nom: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Gen: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Acc: viettâr
    viettâr+N+Sg+Ill: vietârân
    viettâr+N+Sg+Loc: vietârist
    viettâr+N+Sg+Com: vietâráin
    viettâr+N+Sg+Abe: viettârttáá
    viettâr+N+Ess: vietârin 
    viettâr+N+Par: vietârid 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Nom: vietâreh
    viettâr+N+Pl+Gen: vietârij
    viettâr+N+Pl+Acc: vietârijd 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Ill: vietâráid 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Loc: vietârijn 
    viettâr+N+Pl+Com: [vietârijguin, vietârijgijn]
    viettâr+N+Pl+Abe: vietârijttáá

  Noun - eehid: # ok
    eehid+N+Sg+Nom: eehid
    eehid+N+Sg+Gen: eehid
    eehid+N+Sg+Acc: eehid
    eehid+N+Sg+Ill: ehidân
    eehid+N+Sg+Loc: ehidist
    eehid+N+Sg+Com: ehidáin
    eehid+N+Sg+Abe: eehidttáá
    eehid+N+Ess: ehidin
    eehid+N+Par: ehidid
    eehid+N+Pl+Nom: ehideh
    eehid+N+Pl+Gen: ehidij
    eehid+N+Pl+Acc: ehidijd
    eehid+N+Pl+Ill: ehidáid
    eehid+N+Pl+Loc: ehidijn
    eehid+N+Pl+Com: [ehidijguin, ehidijgijn]
    eehid+N+Pl+Abe: ehidijttáá

  Noun - juuhâm: # ok
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Nom: juuhâm
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Gen: juuhâm
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Acc: juuhâm
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Ill: juhâmân
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Loc: juhâmist
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Com: juhâmáin
    juuhâm+N+Sg+Abe: juuhâmttáá
    juuhâm+N+Ess: juhâmin
    juuhâm+N+Par: juhâmid
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Nom: juhâmeh
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Gen: juhâmij
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Acc: juhâmijd
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Ill: juhâmáid
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Loc: juhâmijn
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Com: [juhâmijguin, juhâmijgijn]
    juuhâm+N+Pl+Abe: juhâmijttáá

  Noun - suohâd: # ok
    suohâd+N+Sg+Nom: suohâd
    suohâd+N+Sg+Gen: suohâd
    suohâd+N+Sg+Acc: suohâd
    suohâd+N+Sg+Ill: suohâdân
    suohâd+N+Sg+Loc: suohâdist
    suohâd+N+Sg+Com: suohâdáin
    suohâd+N+Sg+Abe: suohâdttáá
    suohâd+N+Ess: suohâdin
    suohâd+N+Par: suohâdid
    suohâd+N+Pl+Nom: suohâdeh
    suohâd+N+Pl+Gen: suohâdij
    suohâd+N+Pl+Acc: suohâdijd
    suohâd+N+Pl+Ill: suohâdáid
    suohâd+N+Pl+Loc: suohâdijn
    suohâd+N+Pl+Com: [suohâdijguin, suohâdijgijn]
    suohâd+N+Pl+Abe: suohâdijttáá

  Noun - čuoivâg: # 1B
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Nom: čuoivâg
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Gen: čuoivâg
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Acc: čuoivâg
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Ill: čuoivâgân
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Loc: čuoivâgist
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Com: čuoivâgáin
    čuoivâg+N+Sg+Abe: čuoivâgttáá
    čuoivâg+N+Ess: čuoivâgin
    čuoivâg+N+Par: čuoivâgid
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Nom: čuoivâgeh
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Gen: čuoivâgij
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Acc: čuoivâgijd
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Ill: čuoivâgáid
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Loc: čuoivâgijn
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Com: [čuoivâgijguin, čuoivâgijgijn]
    čuoivâg+N+Pl+Abe: čuoivâgijttáá

  Noun - kyeppir: # 1B
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Nom: [kyeppir, kyever, kyeveer] # According to Elsa-ákku, kye´ver is wrong. Should be checked. Now this seems to have a hard-coding. 
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Gen: kyeppir
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Acc: kyeppir
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Ill: kyepirân
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Loc: kyepirist
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Com: kyepiráin
    kyeppir+N+Sg+Abe: kyeppirttáá
    kyeppir+N+Ess: kyepirin
    kyeppir+N+Par: kyepirid
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Nom: kyepireh
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Gen: kyepirij
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Acc: kyepirijd
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Ill: kyepiráid
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Loc: kyepirijn
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Com: [kyepirijguin, kyepirijgijn]
    kyeppir+N+Pl+Abe: kyepirijttáá


  Noun - käähir: # MLO, ok; ess. often also kähirin; par kähirid; see above
    käähir+N+Sg+Nom: käähir
    käähir+N+Sg+Gen: käähir
    käähir+N+Sg+Acc: käähir
    käähir+N+Sg+Ill: kähirân
    käähir+N+Sg+Loc: kähirist
    käähir+N+Sg+Com: kähiráin
    käähir+N+Sg+Abe: käähirttáá
    käähir+N+Ess: kähirin
    käähir+N+Par: kähirid
    käähir+N+Pl+Nom: kähireh
    käähir+N+Pl+Gen: kähirij
    käähir+N+Pl+Acc: kähirijd
    käähir+N+Pl+Ill: kähiráid
    käähir+N+Pl+Loc: kähirijn
    käähir+N+Pl+Com: [kähirijguin, kähirijgijn]
    käähir+N+Pl+Abe: kähirijttáá
